Tennessee, session 114, HB1247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 67, Chapter 6, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) There is exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter the first twenty dollars
($20.00) of the sales price on a sale of tangible personal property paid for with physical
cash. This subsection (a) does not exempt the sale from taxes imposed by other laws,
including taxes imposed pursuant to title 57 or chapter 4, part 10 of this title.
(b) As used in subsection (a), "physical cash":
(1) Means physical, tangible coins, paper money, and notes declared
legal tender by state or federal law; and
(2) Includes physical, tangible gold and silver.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1247
003009
- 1 -